Maine, session 132, LD1995.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3209 is enacted to read:
§3209. Technical assistance materials hub
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"technical assistance materials hub" or "hub" means a centralized source of information
that provides available resources and data to guide decision makers planning for and
implementing projects.
2. Hub established. The office shall coordinate with appropriate tribal, state, regional
and local entities to establish and maintain a technical assistance materials hub on the
publicly accessible website maintained by the office. The office shall make available
through the hub materials addressing a wide variety of topics relevant to communities in
this State, including, but not limited to, planning, climate resilience, housing and
development. The office may also make available through the hub any of the following
materials:
A. A collection of the best available resources regarding projections and models,
assessments and data pertaining to the topics addressed by materials made available
pursuant to this subsection;
B. Tools that allow for the visualization of regions and communities across the State
and that integrate best available data pertaining to the topics addressed by materials
made available pursuant to this subsection;
C. A library of white papers, case studies, research articles and best practices that are
searchable by relevance to region, locality and sector pertaining to the topics addressed
by materials made available pursuant to this subsection;
D. Information about funding opportunities for communities; and
E. Regionally prioritized best practice projects that support regional collaboration.
3. Updates. The office shall regularly update the hub.
Page 1 - 132LR2636(04)